Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 3 RECOVERY
25.5-4-309. False medicaid claims civil investigation demands.

General.

Whenever the attorney general has reason to believe that a person may be in possession, custody, or control of documentary material or information relevant to a false medicaid claims law investigation, the attorney general may, before commencing a civil proceeding under section 25.5-4-306 or other false medicaid claims law or making an election under section 25.5-4-306 (2)(d), issue in writing and cause to be served upon the person a civil investigative demand requiring the person to:

Produce the documentary material for inspection and copying;

Answer in writing written interrogatories with respect to the documentary material or information;

Give oral testimony concerning the documentary material or information; or

Furnish any combination of such material, answers, or testimony.

The attorney general may not delegate the authority to issue civil investigative demands under this subsection (1). Whenever a civil investigative demand is an express demand for any product of discovery, the attorney general, the deputy attorney general, or an assistant attorney general shall cause to be served, in any manner authorized by this section, a copy of the demand upon the person from whom the discovery was obtained and shall notify the person to whom the demand is issued of the date on which the copy was served.

Each civil investigative demand issued under this subsection (1) shall state the nature of the conduct constituting the alleged violation of a false medicaid claims law that is under investigation and the applicable provision of law alleged to be violated.

If the demand is for the production of documentary material, the demand shall:

Describe each class of documentary material to be produced with such definiteness and certainty as to permit the material to be fairly identified;

Prescribe a return date for each such class that will provide a reasonable period of time within which the material so demanded may be assembled and made available for inspection and copying; and

Identify the false medicaid claims law investigator to whom the material shall be made available.

If the demand is for answers to written interrogatories, the demand shall:

Specify the written interrogatories to be answered;

Prescribe dates on which answers to written interrogatories shall be submitted; and

Identify the false medicaid claims law investigator to whom the answers shall be submitted.

If the demand is for the giving of oral testimony, the demand shall:

Prescribe a date, time, and place at which oral testimony shall be commenced and notify the deponent if the oral testimony is to be video or audio recorded;

Identify a false medicaid claims law investigator who shall conduct the examination and the custodian to whom the transcript of the examination shall be submitted;

Specify that such attendance and testimony are necessary to the conduct of the investigation;

Notify the person receiving the demand of the right to be accompanied by an attorney and any other representative; and

Describe the general purpose for which the demand is being issued and the general nature of the testimony, including the primary areas of inquiry, that will be taken pursuant to the demand.

A civil investigative demand issued under this section that is an express demand for any product of discovery shall not be returned or returnable until twenty days after a copy of the demand has been served upon the person from whom the discovery was obtained.

The date prescribed for the commencement of oral testimony pursuant to a civil investigative demand issued under this section shall be a date that is not less than seven days after the date on which the demand is received, unless the attorney general or an assistant attorney general designated by the attorney general determines that exceptional circumstances are present that warrant the commencement of the testimony within a lesser period of time.

The attorney general shall not authorize the issuance under this section of more than one civil investigative demand for oral testimony by the same person unless the person requests otherwise or unless the attorney general, after investigation, notifies that person in writing that an additional demand for oral testimony is necessary. Notwithstanding section 24-31-103, C.R.S., the attorney general shall not authorize the performance, by any other officer, employee, or agency, of any function vested in the attorney general under this subparagraph (VII).

Protected material or information.

A civil investigative demand issued under subsection (1) of this section shall not require the production of documentary material, the submission of answers to written interrogatories, or the giving of oral testimony if the material, answers, or testimony would be protected from disclosure under:

The standards applicable to subpoenas or subpoenas duces tecum issued by a court of this state to aid in a grand jury investigation; or

The standards applicable to discovery requests under the Colorado rules of civil procedure, to the extent that the application of the standards to any such demand is appropriate and consistent with the provisions and purposes of this section.

A demand that is an express demand for a product of discovery supersedes any inconsistent order, rule, or provision of law, other than this section, preventing or restraining disclosure of the product of discovery to a person. Disclosure of a product of discovery pursuant to an express demand does not constitute a waiver of any right or privilege that the person making the disclosure may be entitled to invoke to resist discovery of trial preparation materials.

Service and jurisdiction.

A civil investigative demand issued under subsection (1) of this section or a petition brought pursuant to subsection (10) of this section may be served by a false medicaid claims law investigator, a sheriff, or a deputy sheriff at any place within the state.

A civil investigative demand issued under subsection (1) of this section or a petition filed under subsection (10) of this section may be served upon a person who is not found within the state in the manner prescribed by the Colorado rules of civil procedure for service in another state or a foreign country. To the extent that the courts of this state can assert jurisdiction over any such person consistent with due process, the district court for the city and county of Denver shall have the same jurisdiction to take an action respecting compliance with this section by any such person that the court would have if the person were personally within the jurisdiction of the court.

Service on legal entities and natural persons.

Service of a civil investigative demand issued under subsection (1) of this section or of a petition filed under subsection (10) of this section may be made upon a partnership, corporation, association, or other legal entity by:

Delivering an executed copy of the demand or petition to a partner, executive officer, managing agent, or general agent of the partnership, corporation, association, or entity, or to an agent authorized by appointment or by law to receive service of process on behalf of the partnership, corporation, association, or entity;

Delivering an executed copy of the demand or petition to the principal office or place of business of the partnership, corporation, association, or entity; or

Depositing an executed copy of the demand or petition in the United States mail by registered or certified mail, with a return receipt requested, addressed to the partnership, corporation, association, or entity at its principal office or place of business.

Service of a civil investigative demand issued under subsection (1) of this section or of a petition filed under subsection (10) of this section may be made upon a natural person by:

Delivering an executed copy of the demand or petition to the person; or

Depositing an executed copy of the demand or petition in the United States mail by registered or certified mail, with a return receipt requested, addressed to the person at the person's residence, principal office, or place of business.

Proof of service. A verified return by the individual serving a civil investigative demand issued under subsection (1) of this section or a petition filed under subsection (10) of this section setting forth the manner of the service shall be proof of the service. In the case of service by registered or certified mail, the return shall be accompanied by the return post office receipt of delivery of the demand.

Documentary material.

The production of documentary material in response to a civil investigative demand issued under subsection (1) of this section shall be made under a sworn certificate, in the form as the demand designates, by:

In the case of a natural person, the person to whom the demand is directed; or

In the case of a person other than a natural person, a person having knowledge of the facts and circumstances relating to the production and authorized to act on behalf of the person.

The certificate shall state that all of the documentary material required by the demand and in the possession, custody, or control of the person to whom the demand is directed has been produced and made available to the false medicaid claims law investigator identified in the demand.

A person upon whom a civil investigative demand for the production of documentary material has been served under this section shall make the material available for inspection and copying to the false medicaid claims law investigator identified in the demand at the principal place of business of the person, or at such other place as the false medicaid claims law investigator and the person thereafter may agree and prescribe in writing, or as the court may direct under subsection (10) of this section. The material shall be made so available on the return date specified in the demand, or on such later date as the false medicaid claims law investigator may prescribe in writing. The person may, upon written agreement between the person and the false medicaid claims law investigator, substitute copies for originals of all or any part of the material.

Interrogatories.

Each interrogatory in a civil investigative demand issued under subsection (1) of this section shall be answered separately and fully in writing under oath and shall be submitted under a sworn certificate, in the form the demand designates, by:

In the case of a natural person, the person to whom the demand is directed; or

In the case of a person other than a natural person, the person or persons responsible for answering each interrogatory.

If an interrogatory is objected to, the reasons for the objection shall be stated in the certificate instead of an answer. The certificate shall state that all information required by the demand and in the possession, custody, control, or knowledge of the person to whom the demand is directed has been submitted. To the extent that any information is not furnished, the information shall be identified and reasons set forth with particularity regarding the reasons why the information was not furnished.

Oral examinations.

The examination of a person pursuant to a civil investigative demand for oral testimony issued under subsection (1) of this section shall be taken before an officer authorized to administer oaths and affirmations by the laws of the United States, the state of Colorado, or the place where the examination is held. The officer before whom the testimony is to be taken shall put the witness on oath or affirmation and shall, personally or with the assistance of someone acting under the direction of the officer and in the officer's presence, record the testimony of the witness. The testimony shall be taken stenographically and shall be transcribed. When the testimony is fully transcribed, the officer before whom the testimony is taken shall promptly transmit a copy of the transcript of the testimony to the custodian. This subsection (8) shall not preclude the taking of testimony by any means authorized by, and in a manner consistent with, the Colorado rules of civil procedure.

The false medicaid claims law investigator conducting the examination shall exclude from the place where the examination is held all persons except the person giving the testimony, the attorney for and any other representative of the person giving the testimony, the attorney for the state, any person who may be agreed upon by the attorney for the state and the person giving the testimony, the officer before whom the testimony is to be taken, and the stenographer who is recording the testimony.

The oral testimony of a person taken pursuant to a civil investigative demand served under this section shall be taken in the judicial district of the state within which the person resides, is found, or transacts business, or in another place as may be agreed upon by the false medicaid claims law investigator conducting the examination and the person.

When the testimony is fully transcribed, the false medicaid claims law investigator or the officer before whom the testimony is taken shall afford the witness, who may be accompanied by counsel, a reasonable opportunity to examine and read the transcript, unless the witness waives the examination and reading. Any changes in form or substance that the witness desires to make shall be entered and identified upon the transcript by the officer or the false medicaid claims law investigator, with a statement of the reasons given by the witness for making the changes. The transcript shall then be signed by the witness, unless the witness in writing waives the signing, is ill, cannot be found, or refuses to sign. If the witness does not sign the transcript within thirty days after being afforded a reasonable opportunity to examine it, the officer or the false medicaid claims law investigator shall sign it and state on the record the fact of the waiver, illness, absence of the witness, or refusal to sign, together with the reasons, if any, given therefor.

The officer before whom the testimony is taken shall certify on the transcript that the witness was sworn by the officer and that the transcript is a true record of the testimony given by the witness, and the officer or false medicaid claims law investigator shall promptly deliver the transcript, or send the transcript by registered or certified mail, to the custodian.

Upon payment of reasonable charges therefor, the false medicaid claims law investigator shall furnish a copy of the transcript to the witness only; except that the attorney general, the deputy attorney general, or an assistant attorney general may, for good cause, limit the witness to inspection of the official transcript of the testimony of the witness.

A person compelled to appear for oral testimony under a civil investigative demand issued under subsection (1) of this section may be accompanied, represented, and advised by counsel. Counsel may advise the person, in confidence, with respect to any question asked of the person. The person or counsel may object on the record to any question, in whole or in part, and shall briefly state for the record the reason for the objection. An objection may be made, received, and entered upon the record when it is claimed that the person is entitled to refuse to answer the question on the grounds of any constitutional or other legal right or privilege, including the privilege against self-incrimination. The person may not otherwise object to or refuse to answer any question and may not directly or through counsel otherwise interrupt the oral examination. If the person refuses to answer a question, the false medicaid claims law investigator may file a petition in a district court under paragraph (a) of subsection (10) of this section for an order compelling the person to answer the question.

If the person refuses to answer a question on the grounds of the privilege against self-incrimination, the false medicaid claims law investigator may compel the testimony of the person in accordance with the provisions of section 13-90-118, C.R.S.

A person appearing for oral testimony under a civil investigative demand issued under subsection (1) of this section shall be entitled to the same fees and allowances that are paid to witnesses in the district courts of this state.

Custodian of documents, answers, and transcripts.

The attorney general shall designate a false medicaid claims law investigator to serve as custodian of documentary material, answers to interrogatories, and transcripts of oral testimony received under this section and shall designate such additional false medicaid claims law investigators as the attorney general determines from time to time to be necessary to serve as deputies to the custodian.

A false medicaid claims law investigator who receives any documentary material, answers to interrogatories, or transcripts of oral testimony under this section shall transmit them to the custodian. The custodian shall take physical possession of the material, answers, or transcripts and shall be responsible for the use made of them and for the return of documentary material under paragraph (d) of this subsection (9).

The custodian may cause the preparation of copies of the documentary material, answers to interrogatories, or transcripts of oral testimony as may be required for official use by a false medicaid claims law investigator or other officer or employee of the department of law who is authorized for such use under regulations that the attorney general shall issue. The material, answers, and transcripts may be used by any such authorized false medicaid claims law investigator or other officer or employee in connection with the taking of oral testimony under this section.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (9), documentary material, answers to interrogatories, or transcripts of oral testimony, or copies thereof, while in the possession of the custodian, shall not be available for examination by an individual other than a false medicaid claims law investigator or other officer or employee of the department of law authorized under subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (b).

Sub-subparagraph (A) of this subparagraph (III) shall not apply if consent is given by the person who produced the material, answers, or transcripts or, in the case of any product of discovery produced pursuant to an express demand for the material, if consent is given by the person from whom the discovery was obtained.

Nothing in this subparagraph (III) is intended to prevent disclosure to the general assembly, including any committee of the general assembly, or to any other agency of the state for use by the agency in furtherance of its statutory responsibilities. Disclosure of information to any such other agency shall be allowed only upon application, made by the attorney general to a district court, showing substantial need for the use of the information by the agency in furtherance of its statutory responsibilities.

While in the possession of the custodian and under such reasonable terms and conditions as the attorney general shall prescribe:

Documentary material and answers to interrogatories shall be available for examination by the person who produced the material or answers, or by a representative of that person authorized by that person to examine the material and answers; and

Transcripts of oral testimony shall be available for examination by the person who produced the testimony or by a representative of that person authorized by that person to examine the transcripts.

Whenever an attorney of the department of law has been designated to appear before a court, grand jury, or state agency in a case or proceeding, the custodian of any documentary material, answers to interrogatories, or transcripts of oral testimony received under this section may deliver to the attorney such material, answers, or transcripts for official use in connection with the case or proceeding as the attorney determines to be required. Upon the completion of the case or proceeding, the attorney shall return to the custodian the material, answers, or transcripts so delivered that are not in the control of the court, grand jury, or agency through introduction into the record of the case or proceeding.

The custodian shall, upon written request of a person who produced any documentary material in the course of any false medicaid claims law investigation pursuant to a civil investigative demand under this section, return to the person any such material, other than copies furnished to the false medicaid claims law investigator under paragraph (b) of subsection (6) of this section or made for the department of law under subparagraph (II) of paragraph (b) of this subsection (9), that is not in the control of a court, grand jury, or agency through introduction into the record of the case or proceeding, if:

A case or proceeding before a court or grand jury arising out of the investigation or any proceeding before a state agency involving the material has been completed; or

A case or proceeding in which the material may be used has not been commenced within a reasonable time after completion of the examination and analysis of all documentary material and other information assembled in the course of the investigation.

In the event of the death, disability, or separation from service in the department of law of the custodian of any documentary material, answers to interrogatories, or transcripts of oral testimony produced pursuant to a civil investigative demand under this section, or in the event of the official relief of the custodian from responsibility for the custody and control of the material, answers, or transcripts, the attorney general shall promptly:

Designate another false medicaid claims law investigator to serve as custodian of the material, answers, or transcripts; and

Transmit in writing to the person who produced the material, answers, or testimony notice of the identity and address of the successor so designated.

A person who is designated to be a successor under this paragraph (e) shall have, with regard to the material, answers, or transcripts, the same duties and responsibilities as were imposed by this section upon that person's predecessor in office; except that the successor shall not be held responsible for any default or dereliction that occurred before that designation.

Judicial proceedings.

Whenever a person fails to comply with a civil investigative demand issued under subsection (1) of this section, or whenever satisfactory copying or reproduction of the material requested in a demand cannot be done and the person refuses to surrender the material, the attorney general may file, in a district court for the judicial district in which the person resides, is found, or transacts business, and serve upon the person a petition for an order of the court for the enforcement of the civil investigative demand.

A person who has received a civil investigative demand issued under subsection (1) of this section may file a petition for an order of the court to modify or set aside the demand. The person shall file the petition in a district court for the judicial district within which the person resides, is found, or transacts business and shall serve a copy of the petition upon the false medicaid claims law investigator identified in the demand. In the case of a petition addressed to an express demand for a product of discovery, the person may file a petition to modify or set aside the demand only in the district court for the judicial district in which the proceeding in which the discovery was obtained is or was last pending. The person shall file a petition under this subparagraph (I):

Within twenty days after the date of service of the civil investigative demand or at any time before the return date specified in the demand, whichever date is earlier; or

Within such longer period as may be prescribed in writing by a false medicaid claims law investigator identified in the demand.

The petition shall specify each ground upon which the petitioner relies in seeking relief under subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b) and may be based upon any failure of the demand to comply with the provisions of this section or upon any constitutional or other legal right or privilege of the person. During the pendency of the petition in the court, the court may stay, as it deems proper, the running of the time allowed for compliance with the demand, in whole or in part; except that the person filing the petition shall comply with any portions of the demand not sought to be modified or set aside.

In the case of a civil investigative demand issued under subsection (1) of this section that is an express demand for a product of discovery, the person from whom the discovery was obtained may file a petition for an order of the court to modify or set aside those portions of the demand requiring production of any product of discovery. The person shall file the petition in the district court for the judicial district in which the proceeding in which the discovery was obtained is or was last pending and shall serve a copy of the petition upon the false medicaid claims law investigator identified in the demand and upon the recipient of the demand. The person shall file a petition under this subparagraph (I):

Within twenty days after the date of service of the civil investigative demand or at any time before the return date specified in the demand, whichever date is earlier; or

Within such longer period as may be prescribed in writing by the false medicaid claims law investigator identified in the demand.

The petition shall specify each ground upon which the petitioner relies in seeking relief under subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (c), and may be based upon any failure of the portions of the demand from which relief is sought to comply with the provisions of this section or upon any constitutional or other legal right or privilege of the petitioner. During the pendency of the petition, the court may stay, as it deems proper, compliance with the demand and the running of the time allowed for compliance with the demand.

At any time during which a custodian is in custody or control of any documentary material or answers to interrogatories produced, or transcripts of oral testimony given, by a person in compliance with a civil investigative demand issued under subsection (1) of this section, the person, and in the case of an express demand for any product of discovery, the person from whom the discovery was obtained, may file a petition for an order of the court to require the performance by the custodian of any duty imposed upon the custodian by this section. The person shall file the petition in the district court for the judicial district within which the office of the custodian is situated and shall serve a copy of the petition upon the custodian.

Whenever a petition is filed in a district court under this subsection (10), the court shall have jurisdiction to hear and determine the matter so presented and to enter such order or orders as may be required to carry out the provisions of this section. A final order so entered shall be subject to appeal under section 13-4-102, C.R.S. Any disobedience of a final order entered by a court under this section shall be punished as a contempt of the court.

The Colorado rules of civil procedure shall apply to a petition under this subsection (10) to the extent that the rules are consistent with the provisions of this section.

Disclosure exemption. Any documentary material, answers to written interrogatories, or oral testimony provided under a civil investigative demand issued under subsection (1) of this section shall be exempt from disclosure under section 24-72-203, C.R.S.

Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Custodian" means the custodian, or any deputy custodian, designated by the attorney general under paragraph (a) of subsection (9) of this section.

"Documentary material" means the original or a copy of a book, record, report, memorandum, paper, communication, tabulation, chart, or other document, or data compilations stored in or accessible through computer or other information retrieval systems, together with instructions and all other materials necessary to use or interpret the data compilations, and any product of discovery.

"False medicaid claims law" means:

This section and sections 25.5-4-303.5 to 25.5-4-308; and

Any law enacted before, on, or after May 26, 2010, that prohibits or makes available to the state in a court of the state a civil remedy with respect to a false medicaid claim against, bribery of, or corruption of an officer or employee of the state.

"False medicaid claims law investigation" means an inquiry conducted by a false medicaid claims law investigator for the purpose of ascertaining whether a person is or has been engaged in a violation of a false medicaid claims law.

"False medicaid claims law investigator" means an attorney or investigator employed by the department of law who is charged with the duty of enforcing or carrying into effect a false medicaid claims law or an officer or employee of the state acting under the direction and supervision of the attorney or investigator in connection with a false medicaid claims law investigation.

"Person" means a natural person, partnership, corporation, association, or other legal entity.

"Product of discovery" means:

The original or duplicate of a deposition, interrogatory, document, thing, result of the inspection of land or other property, examination, or admission, any one of which is obtained by a method of discovery in a judicial or administrative proceeding of an adversarial nature;

A digest, analysis, selection, compilation, or derivation of an item listed in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (g); and

An index or other manner of access to an item listed in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (g).

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (SB 10-167), ch. 296, p. 1387, § 14, effective May 26.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 10-167, see section 1 of chapter 296, Session Laws of Colorado 2010.

25.5-4-310. Medicaid false claims report.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), on or before January 15, 2012, and on or before each January 15 thereafter, the attorney general shall submit a written report to the health and human services committees of the senate and the house of representatives, or any successor committees, and to the joint budget committee of the general assembly concerning claims brought under the "Colorado Medicaid False Claims Act" during the previous fiscal year. The report shall include, but not be limited to:

The number of actions filed by the attorney general;

The number of actions filed by the attorney general that were completed;

The amount that was recovered in actions filed by the attorney general through settlement or through a judgment and, if known, the amount recovered for damages, penalties, and litigation costs;

The number of actions filed by a person other than the attorney general;

The number of actions filed by a person other than the attorney general that were completed;

The amount that was recovered in actions filed by a person other than the attorney general through settlement or through a judgment and, if known, the amount recovered for damages, penalties, and litigation costs, and the amount recovered by the state and the person; and

The amount expended by the state for investigation, litigation, and all other costs for claims related to the "Colorado Medicaid False Claims Act".

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (SB 10-167), ch. 296, p. 1399, § 14, effective May 26.

L. 2017:

IP(1) amended, (SB 17-233), ch. 175, p. 637, § 3, effective August 9.

Cross references:

(1) For the "Colorado Medicaid False Claims Act", see section 25.5-4-303.5.

(2) For the legislative declaration in SB 10-167, see section 1 of chapter 296, Session Laws of Colorado 2010.